Materials for lyx workshop/LyX.app/Contents/Resources/dicts/ca_XV.aff
FLAG num
SFX 959	Y	1	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 959	lluir	0	.		#imperfecte

SFX 960	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 960	mitificar	mitifiquí	.		#perfecte
SFX 960	mitificar	mitificares	.		#perfecte
SFX 960	mitificar	mitificà	.		#perfecte
SFX 960	mitificar	mitificàrem	.		#perfecte
SFX 960	mitificar	mitificàreu	.		#perfecte
SFX 960	mitificar	smitificaren	.		#perfecte

SFX 961	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 961	ncloure	ncloc/453	.		#present
SFX 961	ncloure	clous/453	.		#present
SFX 961	ncloure	nclou/453	.		#present
SFX 961	ncloure	ncloem/453	.		#present
SFX 961	ncloure	ncloeu/453	.		#present
SFX 961	ncloure	nclouen/453	.		#present

SFX 962	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 962	ncloure	ncloguera	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 962	ncloure	nclogueres	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 962	ncloure	cncloguérem	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 962	ncloure	ncloguéreu	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 962	ncloure	nclogueren	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte

SFX 963	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 963	ndoldre	ndolc/453	.		#present
SFX 963	ndoldre	lndols/453	.		#present
SFX 963	ndoldre	ndol/453	.		#present
SFX 963	ndoldre	ndolem/453	.		#present
SFX 963	ndoldre	ndoleu/453	.		#present
SFX 963	ndoldre	ndolen/453	.		#present

SFX 964	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 964	ocopar	ocopí	.		#perfecte
SFX 964	ocopar	ocopares	.		#perfecte
SFX 964	ocopar	ocopà	.		#perfecte
SFX 964	ocopar	ocopàrem	.		#perfecte
SFX 964	ocopar	copàreu	.		#perfecte
SFX 964	ocopar	ocoparen	.		#perfecte

SFX 965	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 965	oder	uc/453	.		#present
SFX 965	oder	ots/453	.		#present
SFX 965	oder	ot/453	.		#present
SFX 965	oder	odem/453	.		#present
SFX 965	oder	odeu/453	.		#present
SFX 965	oder	oden/453	.		#present

SFX 966	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 966	oder	uga/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 966	oder	ugues/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 966	oder	ugam/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 966	oder	ugau/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 966	oder	uguen/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent

SFX 967	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 967	oder	oder/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 967	oder	ugues/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 967	oder	uga/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 967	oder	ugam/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 967	oder	ugau/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 967	oder	uguen/453	.		#imperatiu

SFX 968	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 968	oir	oya	.		#imperfecte
SFX 968	oir	oyes	.		#imperfecte
SFX 968	oir	òyem	.		#imperfecte
SFX 968	oir	òyeu	.		#imperfecte
SFX 968	oir	oyen	.		#imperfecte

SFX 969	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 969	oixir	uixca/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 969	oixir	uixques/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 969	oixir	uixcam/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 969	oixir	uixcau/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 969	oixir	uixquen/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent

SFX 970	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 970	oixir	uixc/453	.		#present
SFX 970	oixir	uixes/453	.		#present
SFX 970	oixir	uix/453	.		#present
SFX 970	oixir	oixim/453	.		#present
SFX 970	oixir	oixiu/453	.		#present
SFX 970	oixir	uixen/453	.		#present

SFX 971	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 971	oixir	oixir/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 971	oixir	uix/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 971	oixir	uixca/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 971	oixir	uixcam/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 971	oixir	uixcau/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 971	oixir	uixquen/453	.		#imperatiu

SFX 972	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 972	olir	ulga/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 972	olir	ulgues/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 972	olir	ulgam/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 972	olir	ulgau/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 972	olir	ulguen/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent

SFX 973	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 973	olir	ula/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 973	olir	ules/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 973	olir	ulam/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 973	olir	ulau/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 973	olir	ulen/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent

SFX 974	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 974	olir	ulc/453	.		#present
SFX 974	olir	uls/453	.		#present
SFX 974	olir	ul/453	.		#present
SFX 974	olir	olim/453	.		#present
SFX 974	olir	oliu/453	.		#present
SFX 974	olir	ulen/453	.		#present

SFX 975	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 975	olir	olir/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 975	olir	ul/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 975	olir	ulga/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 975	olir	ulgam/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 975	olir	ulgau/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 975	olir	ulguen/453	.		#imperatiu

SFX 976	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 976	onyir	onyir/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 976	onyir	unya/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 976	onyir	unyam/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 976	onyir	unyau/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 976	onyir	unyen/453	.		#imperatiu

SFX 977	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 977	onyir	onyir/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 977	onyir	uny/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 977	onyir	unya/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 977	onyir	unyam/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 977	onyir	unyau/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 977	onyir	unyen/453	.		#imperatiu

SFX 978	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 978	ortir	urt/453	.		#present
SFX 978	ortir	urts/453	.		#present
SFX 978	ortir	ortim/453	.		#present
SFX 978	ortir	ortiu/453	.		#present
SFX 978	ortir	urten/453	.		#present

SFX 979	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 979	ortir	urta/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 979	ortir	urtes/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 979	ortir	urtam/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 979	ortir	urtau/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 979	ortir	urten/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent

SFX 980	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 980	ortir	ortir/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 980	ortir	urt/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 980	ortir	urta/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 980	ortir	urtam/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 980	ortir	urtau/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 980	ortir	urten/453	.		#imperatiu

SFX 981	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 981	osir	osir/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 981	osir	usques/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 981	osir	usca/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 981	osir	uscam/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 981	osir	uscau/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 981	osir	usquen/453	.		#imperatiu

SFX 982	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 982	ossir	ossir/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 982	ossir	usga/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 982	ossir	usgam/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 982	ossir	usgau/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 982	ossir	usguen/453	.		#imperatiu

SFX 983	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 983	ossir	usquera	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 983	ossir	usqueres	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 983	ossir	usquérem	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 983	ossir	usquéreu	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 983	ossir	usqueren	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte

SFX 984	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 984	ossir	ossir/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 984	ossir	us/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 984	ossir	usca/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 984	ossir	uscam/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 984	ossir	uscau/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 984	ossir	usquen/453	.		#imperatiu

SFX 985	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 985	ossir	usga/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 985	ossir	usgues/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 985	ossir	usgam/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 985	ossir	usgau/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 985	ossir	usguen/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent

SFX 986	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 986	ossir	usc/453	.		#present
SFX 986	ossir	usses/453	.		#present
SFX 986	ossir	us/453	.		#present
SFX 986	ossir	ossim/453	.		#present
SFX 986	ossir	ossiu/453	.		#present
SFX 986	ossir	ussen/453	.		#present
