Materials for lyx workshop/LyX.app/Contents/Resources/dicts/ca_XV.dic
apocopar/451,455,456,457,458,459,461,828,878,964,1054
cloixir/455,456,467,468,469,828,940,941,969,970,971,1057,1113
condoldre/481,483,484,490,492,953,954,963,1082
cosir/455,456,467,468,469,697,698,699,700,828,981,1054
desmitificar/455,456,457,458,473,474,475,828,960,1054
engolir/451,455,456,467,468,469,828,972,973,974,975,1054
inconcloure/451,481,482,499,500,501,961,962,1036,1071
tossir/455,456,467,468,469,828,982,983,984,985,986,987,1054,1057
